Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 9. Disposition.
§ 16.1-278.5.
Children in need of supervision.

If a child is found to be in need of supervision, the court shall, before final disposition of the case, direct the appropriate public agency to evaluate the child’s service needs using an interdisciplinary team approach. The team shall consist of qualified personnel who are reasonably available from the appropriate department of social services, community services board, local school division, court service unit and other appropriate and available public and private agencies and may be the family assessment and planning team established pursuant to §

2.2-5207

. A report of the evaluation shall be filed as provided in §

16.1-274

A. In lieu of directing an evaluation be made, the court may consider the report concerning the child of an interdisciplinary team which met not more than ninety days prior to the court’s making a finding that the child is in need of supervision.

The court may make any of the following orders of disposition for the supervision, care and rehabilitation of the child:

Enter any order of disposition authorized by §

16.1-278.4

for a child found to be in need of services;

Place the child on probation under such conditions and limitations as the court may prescribe including suspension of the child’s driver’s license upon terms and conditions which may include the issuance of a restricted license for those purposes set forth in subsection E of §

18.2-271.1

;

Order the child and/or his parent to participate in such programs, cooperate in such treatment or be subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may order and as are designed for the rehabilitation of the child;

Require the child to participate in a public service project under such conditions as the court may prescribe; or

Beginning July 1, 1992, in the case of any child subject to compulsory school attendance as provided in § 22.1-254, where the court finds that the child’s parent is in violation of §§ 22.1-254, 22.1-255, 22.1-265, or § 22.1-267, in addition to any penalties provided in § 22.1-263 or § 22.1-265, the court may order the parent with whom the child is living to participate in such programs, cooperate in such treatment, or be subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may order and as are designed for the rehabilitation of the child and/or the parent. Upon the failure of the parent to so participate or cooperate, or to comply with the conditions and limitations that the court orders, the court may impose a fine of not more than $100 for each day in which the person fails to comply with the court order.

If the court finds that the parent has willfully disobeyed a lawful process, judgment, decree, or court order requiring such person to comply with the compulsory school attendance law, in addition to any conditions or limitations that the court may order or any penalties provided by §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.19

, 22.1-263 or § 22.1-265, the court may impose the penalty authorized by §

18.2-371

.

Any order entered pursuant to this section shall be provided in writing to the child, his parent or legal custodian, and to the child’s attorney and shall contain adequate notice of the provisions of §

16.1-292

regarding willful violation of such order.

History.

1991, c. 534; 1992, cc. 837, 880; 1996, c. 45; 1997, c. 210.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For article summarizing published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 2002 and July 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2003).

§ 16.1-278.6.
Status offenders.

If a child is alleged to be a status offender, including but not limited to those cases in which the juvenile is alleged to have committed a curfew violation or a violation of the law regarding tobacco, the juvenile court or the circuit court may enter any order of disposition authorized by §

16.1-278.4

.

History.

1991, c. 534; 1997, c. 463.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

This statute does not require the issuance of a subpoena to a local department of social services,

because the department, as a non-party, is not required to attend any proceeding. However, should a court want the local department to be present for such proceedings, then a subpoena or other court order can be issued to compel the local department to appear. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Gayl Branum Carr, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court, 19th Judicial District, 12-027, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 19 (5/25/12).

§ 16.1-278.7.
Commitment to Department of Juvenile Justice.

Only a juvenile who is (i) adjudicated delinquent of an act enumerated in subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

and is 11 years of age or older or (ii) 14 years of age or older may be committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice. In cases where a waiver of an investigation has been granted pursuant to subdivision A 14 or A 17 of §

16.1-278.8

, at the time a court commits a child to the Department of Juvenile Justice the court shall order an investigation pursuant to §

16.1-273

to be completed within 15 days. No juvenile court or circuit court shall order the commitment of any child jointly to the Department of Juvenile Justice and to a local board of social services or transfer the custody of a child jointly to a court service unit of a juvenile court and to a local board of social services. Any person sentenced and committed to an active term of incarceration in the Department of Corrections who is, at the time of such sentencing, in the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice, upon pronouncement of sentence, shall be immediately transferred to the Department of Corrections.

History.

1991, c. 534; 2000, cc. 954, 981, 988; 2007, c. 510; 2014, cc. 20, 249; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 115.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 954, 981, and 988 are identical, and substituted “Only a juvenile who is adjudicated as a delinquent and is eleven years of age or older may,” for “Unless a child found to be abused, neglected, in need of services, in need of supervision or a status offender is also found to be delinquent and is older than ten years of age, he shall not” in the first sentence, deleted “public welfare or” preceding “social services” twice in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 510 inserted the present second sentence and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 20 and 249, effective October 1, 2014, beginning of second sentence, substituted “In cases where a waiver of an investigation has been granted pursuant to subdivision A 14 or A 17 of §

16.1-278.8

” for “Unless previously completed.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 115, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “(i) adjudicated delinquent of an act enumerated in subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

and is 11 years of age or older or (ii) 14 years of age or older” for “adjudicated as a delinquent and is 11 years of age or older.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 16.1-278.7:01.
Department to give notice of the receipt of certain persons.

At the time or receipt of any person, for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, the Department shall obtain from that person all necessary registration information, including fingerprints and photographs of a type and kind approved by the Department of State Police. A person required to register shall register and submit to be photographed as part of the registration. The Department shall forthwith forward the registration information and photograph to the Department of State Police on the date of the receipt of the person.

Whenever a person required to register has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection A, the Department shall promptly investigate or request the State Police promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or petition or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person was received. The Department shall notify the State Police forthwith of such actions taken pursuant to this section.

History.

2006, cc. 857, 914.

§ 16.1-278.7:02.
Department to give notice of Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry requirements to certain persons.

Prior to the release or discharge of any persons for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, the Department shall give notice to the persons of his duty to register with the State Police. A person required to register shall register, submit to be photographed as part of the registration, and provide information regarding place of employment, if available, to the Department. The Department shall also obtain from that person all necessary registration information, including fingerprints and photographs of a type and kind approved by the Department of State Police; inform the person of his duties regarding reregistration and change of address; and inform the person of his duty to register. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall forward the registration information to the Department of State Police on the date of the person’s release or discharge.

Whenever a person required to register has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection A, the Department shall promptly investigate or request the State Police promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person was discharged. The Department shall notify the State Police forthwith of such actions taken pursuant to this section.

History.

2006, cc. 857, 914.

§ 16.1-278.8.
Delinquent juveniles.

If a juvenile is found to be delinquent, except where such finding involves a refusal to take a breath test in violation of §

18.2-268.2

or a similar ordinance, the juvenile court or the circuit court may make any of the following orders of disposition for his supervision, care and rehabilitation:

Enter an order pursuant to the provisions of §

16.1-278

;

Permit the juvenile to remain with his parent, subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may order with respect to the juvenile and his parent;

Order the parent of a juvenile living with him to participate in such programs, cooperate in such treatment or be subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may order and as are designed for the rehabilitation of the juvenile and his parent;

Defer disposition for a specific period of time established by the court with due regard for the gravity of the offense and the juvenile’s history, after which time the charge may be dismissed by the judge if the juvenile exhibits good behavior during the period for which disposition is deferred;

Without entering a judgment of guilty and with the consent of the juvenile and his attorney, defer disposition of the delinquency charge for a specific period of time established by the court with due regard for the gravity of the offense and the juvenile’s history, and place the juvenile on probation under such conditions and limitations as the court may prescribe. Upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions, the court shall discharge the juvenile and dismiss the proceedings against him. Discharge and dismissal under these provisions shall be without adjudication of guilt;

Order the parent of a juvenile with whom the juvenile does not reside to participate in such programs, cooperate in such treatment or be subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may order and as are designed for the rehabilitation of the juvenile where the court determines this participation to be in the best interest of the juvenile and other parties concerned and where the court determines it reasonable to expect the parent to be able to comply with such order;

Place the juvenile on probation under such conditions and limitations as the court may prescribe;

Impose a fine not to exceed $500 upon such juvenile;

Suspend the motor vehicle and driver’s license of such juvenile or impose a curfew on the juvenile as to the hours during which he may operate a motor vehicle. Any juvenile whose driver’s license is suspended may be referred for an assessment and subsequent referral to appropriate services, upon such terms and conditions as the court may order. The court, in its discretion and upon a demonstration of hardship, may authorize the use of a restricted permit to operate a motor vehicle by any juvenile who enters such program for any of the purposes set forth in subsection E of §

18.2-271.1

or for travel to and from school. The restricted permit shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of such subsection. However, only an abstract of the court order that identifies the juvenile and the conditions under which the restricted license is to be issued shall be sent to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

If a curfew is imposed, the juvenile shall surrender his driver’s license, which shall be held in the physical custody of the court during any period of curfew restriction. The court shall send an abstract of any order issued under the provisions of this section to the Department of Motor Vehicles, which shall preserve a record thereof. Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 12 (§

16.1-299

et seq.) of this chapter or the provisions of Title 46.2, this record shall be available only to all law-enforcement officers, attorneys for the Commonwealth and courts. A copy of the court order, upon which shall be noted all curfew restrictions, shall be provided to the juvenile and shall contain such information regarding the juvenile as is reasonably necessary to identify him. The juvenile may operate a motor vehicle under the court order in accordance with its terms.

Any juvenile who operates a motor vehicle in violation of any restrictions imposed pursuant to this section is guilty of a violation of §

46.2-301

.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall refuse to issue a driver’s license to any juvenile denied a driver’s license until such time as is stipulated in the court order or until notification by the court of withdrawal of the order imposing the curfew;

Require the juvenile to make restitution or reparation to the aggrieved party or parties for actual damages or loss caused by the offense for which the juvenile was found to be delinquent;

Require the juvenile to participate in a public service project under such conditions as the court prescribes;

In case of traffic violations, impose only those penalties that are authorized to be imposed on adults for such violations. However, for those violations punishable by confinement if committed by an adult, confinement shall be imposed only as authorized by this title;

Transfer legal custody to any of the following:

A relative or other individual who, after study, is found by the court to be qualified to receive and care for the juvenile;

A child welfare agency, private organization or facility that is licensed or otherwise authorized by law to receive and provide care for such juvenile. The court shall not transfer legal custody of a delinquent juvenile to an agency, organization or facility outside of the Commonwealth without the approval of the Director; or

The local board of social services of the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction or, at the discretion of the court, to the local board of the county or city in which the juvenile has residence if other than the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction. The board shall accept the juvenile for care and custody, provided that it has been given reasonable notice of the pendency of the case and an opportunity to be heard. However, in an emergency in the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction, such local board may be required to temporarily accept a juvenile for a period not to exceed 14 days without prior notice or an opportunity to be heard if the judge entering the placement order describes the emergency and the need for such temporary placement in the order. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the commitment of a juvenile to any local board of social services in the Commonwealth when such local board consents to the commitment. The board to which the juvenile is committed shall have the final authority to determine the appropriate placement for the juvenile. Nothing herein shall limit the authority of the court to review the child’s status in foster care in accordance with subsection G of §

16.1-281

or to review the foster care plan through a petition filed pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-282

. Any order authorizing removal from the home and transferring legal custody of a juvenile to a local board of social services as provided in this subdivision shall be entered only upon a finding by the court that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal and that continued placement in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the juvenile, and the order shall so state;

If the court finds a juvenile delinquent of any of the following offenses, the court shall require the juvenile to make at least partial restitution or reparation for any property damage, for loss caused by the offense, or for actual medical expenses incurred by the victim as a result of the offense: §

18.2-51

,

18.2-51

.1,

18.2-52

,

18.2-53

,

18.2-55

,

18.2-56

,

18.2-57

,

18.2-57

.2,

18.2-121

,

18.2-127

,

18.2-128

,

18.2-137

,

18.2-138

,

18.2-146

, or

18.2-147

; or for any violation of a local ordinance adopted pursuant to §

15.2-1812.2

. The court shall further require the juvenile to participate in a community service project under such conditions as the court prescribes.

7a.

Place the juvenile on probation and order treatment for the abuse or dependence on alcohol or drugs in a program licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services for the treatment of juveniles for substance abuse provided that (i) the juvenile has received a substance abuse screening and assessment pursuant to §

16.1-273

and that such assessment reasonably indicates that the commission of the offense was motivated by, or closely related to, the habitual use of alcohol or drugs and indicates that the juvenile is in need of treatment for this condition; (ii) the juvenile has not previously been and is not currently being adjudicated for a violent juvenile felony; and (iii) such facility is available. Upon the juvenile’s withdrawal, removal, or refusal to comply with the conditions of participation in the program, he shall be brought before the court for a hearing at which the court may impose any other disposition authorized by this section. The court shall review such placements at 30-day intervals;

14.

Unless waived by an agreement between the attorney for the Commonwealth and the juvenile and his attorney or other legal representative, upon consideration of the results of an investigation completed pursuant to §

16.1-273

, commit the juvenile to the Department of Juvenile Justice, but only if (i) he is 11 years of age or older and has been adjudicated delinquent of an act enumerated in subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

or (ii) he is 14 years of age or older and the current offense is (a) an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult, (b) an offense that would be a Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult and the juvenile has previously been found to be delinquent based on an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult, or (c) an offense that would be a Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult and the juvenile has previously been adjudicated delinquent of three or more offenses that would be a Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult, and each such offense was not a part of a common act, transaction or scheme;

15.

Impose the penalty authorized by §

16.1-284

;

16.

Impose the penalty authorized by §

16.1-284.1

;

17.

Unless waived by an agreement between the attorney for the Commonwealth and the juvenile and his attorney or other legal representative, upon consideration of the results of an investigation completed pursuant to §

16.1-273

, impose the penalty authorized by §

16.1-285.1

;

18.

Impose the penalty authorized by §

16.1-278.9

; or

19.

Require the juvenile to participate in a gang-activity prevention program including, but not limited to, programs funded under the Virginia Juvenile Community Crime Control Act pursuant to §

16.1-309.7

, if available, when a juvenile has been found delinquent of any of the following violations: §

18.2-51

,

18.2-51

.1,

18.2-52

,

18.2-53

,

18.2-55

,

18.2-56

,

18.2-57

,

18.2-57

.2,

18.2-121

,

18.2-127

,

18.2-128

,

18.2-137

,

18.2-138

,

18.2-146

, or

18.2-147

, or any violation of a local ordinance adopted pursuant to §

15.2-1812.2

.

History.

1991, c. 534; 1992, c. 830; 1994, cc. 859, 949; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 318; 1999, cc. 350, 622; 2000, cc. 954, 978, 981, 988, 1020, 1041; 2004, cc. 325, 462; 2005, c. 810; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2014, cc. 20, 249; 2017, c. 623; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 115; 2022, cc. 305, 414, 415.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and added subdivision 4a.

The 1999 amendments.

The amendment by c. 350, in present subdivision A 13 c, in the first, fourth and last sentences, deleted “public welfare or” preceding “social services,” deleted “or” at the end of subdivision 17, inserted “or” at the end of subdivision 18, and added subdivision 19.

The 1999 amendment by c. 622 added the subsection A designator and added subsection B.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 954, 981, and 988 are identical, and in subdivision A 14, substituted “eleven” for “older than ten” and inserted “or older” and deleted “either” preceding “a felony” and “or Class 1 misdemeanor” thereafter, and added language beginning “or (iii) an offense” and ending “by an adult” and in subdivision A 19 and subsection B, deleted “18.2-57.1” preceding “18.2-57.2.”

The 2000 amendment by c. 978, in subdivision A 4a, rewrote clause (i), which formerly read: “(i) is otherwise eligible for commitment to the Department,” and substituted “eleven years of age or older” for “older than ten years of age” in subdivision A 14.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1020 and 1041 are identical, and added subdivision A 7a.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 325 substituted “12” for “twelve” in subddivision A 4 and and in the first sentence of subdivision A 5; substituted “30” for “thirty” in the last sentence of subdivision A 7a; substituted “14” for “fourteen” in the third sentence of paragraph A 13 c; in subdivision A 14, substituted “11” for “eleven” and “of three or more offenses that would be a Class 1 misdemeanor if committed by an adult, and each such offense was not a part of a common act, transaction or scheme” for “on three occasions for offenses which would be a Class 1 misdemeanors if committed by an adult” in clause (iii); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 462 substituted “15.2-1812.2” for “18.2-138.1” in subdivision A 19 and in the first sentence of subsection B and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 810 substituted “established by the court with due regard for the gravity of the offense and the juvenile’s history” for “not to exceed 12 months” in subdivision A 4; substituted “of time established by the court with due regard for the gravity of the offense and the juvenile’s history” for “not to exceed 12 months” in subdivision A 5; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in subdivision A 7a.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 20 and 249, effective October 1, 2014, are identical, and in subdivisions A 14 and A 17 added “Unless waived by an agreement between the attorney for the Commonwealth and the juvenile and his attorney or other legal representative, upon consideration of the results of an investigation completed pursuant to §

16.1-273

.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 623, effective March 16, 2017, in subsection A, deleted “blood or” preceding “breath test” in the introductory paragraph; and in subdivision A 9, substituted “is” for “shall be” in the third paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 115, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “(i) he is 11 years of age or older and has been adjudicated delinquent of an act enumerated in subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

or (ii) he is 14 years of age or older” for “he is 11 years of age or older” and redesignated former clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c) in subdivision A 14.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 305 added the penultimate sentence in subdivision A 13 c.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 414 and 415 are identical, and deleted former subdivision A 4a, which read: “Defer disposition and place the juvenile in the temporary custody of the Department to attend a boot camp established pursuant to §

66-13

provided bed space is available for confinement and the juvenile (i) has been found delinquent for an offense that would be a Class 1 misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult, (ii) has not previously been and is not currently being adjudicated delinquent or found guilty of a violent juvenile felony, (iii) has not previously attended a boot camp, (iv) has not previously been committed to and received by the Department, and (v) has had an assessment completed by the Department or its contractor concerning the appropriateness of the candidate for a boot camp. Upon the juvenile’s withdrawal, removal or refusal to comply with the terms and conditions of participation in the program, he shall be brought before the court for a hearing at which the court may impose any other disposition as authorized by this section which could have been imposed at the time the juvenile was placed in the custody of the Department.”

The 2022 amendments by cc. 414 and 415 are identical, and deleted former subdivision A 4a, which read: “Defer disposition and place the juvenile in the temporary custody of the Department to attend a boot camp established pursuant to §

66-13

provided bed space is available for confinement and the juvenile (i) has been found delinquent for an offense that would be a Class 1 misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult, (ii) has not previously been and is not currently being adjudicated delinquent or found guilty of a violent juvenile felony, (iii) has not previously attended a boot camp, (iv) has not previously been committed to and received by the Department, and (v) has had an assessment completed by the Department or its contractor concerning the appropriateness of the candidate for a boot camp. Upon the juvenile’s withdrawal, removal or refusal to comply with the terms and conditions of participation in the program, he shall be brought before the court for a hearing at which the court may impose any other disposition as authorized by this section which could have been imposed at the time the juvenile was placed in the custody of the Department.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure for the year 2004-2005, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 197 (2005).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 19.

§ 16.1-278.8:01.
Juveniles found delinquent of first drug offense; screening; assessment; drug tests; costs and fees; education or treatment programs.

Whenever any juvenile who has not previously been found delinquent of any offense under Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 or under any statute of the United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs, marijuana, or stimulant, depressant or hallucinogenic drugs, or has not previously had a proceeding against him for a violation of such an offense dismissed as provided in § 4.1- 1120 or

18.2-251

, is found delinquent of any offense concerning the use, in any manner, of drugs, controlled substances, narcotics, marijuana, noxious chemical substances and like substances, the juvenile court or the circuit court shall require such juvenile to undergo a substance abuse screening pursuant to §

16.1-273

and to submit to such periodic substance abuse testing, to include alcohol testing, as may be directed by the court. Such testing shall be conducted by a court services unit of the Department of Juvenile Justice, or by a locally operated court services unit or by personnel of any program or agency approved by the Department. The cost of such testing ordered by the court shall be paid by the Commonwealth from funds appropriated to the Department for this purpose. The court shall also order the juvenile to undergo such treatment or education program for substance abuse, if available, as the court deems appropriate based upon consideration of the substance abuse assessment. The treatment or education shall be provided by a program licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services or by a similar program available through a facility or program operated by or under contract to the Department of Juvenile Justice or a locally operated court services unit or a program funded through the Virginia Juvenile Community Crime Control Act (§

16.1-309.2

et seq.).

History.

2000, cc. 1020, 1041; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2011, cc. 384, 410; 2014, cc. 674, 719; 2021 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 674 and 719, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is at least $66,663 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in the last sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 384 and 410, effective March 23, 2011, are identical, and twice inserted “synthetic cannabinoids” in the first sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 674 and 719 are identical, and deleted “synthetic cannabinoids” twice following “marijuana” in the first sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted “Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or” and “4.1-1120 or.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).